New York, session 2025-2026, S9973.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 853 of the county law, as added by chapter 213 of 2 the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 853. Oneida County-tribal detention agreement. Notwithstanding any 4 other inconsistent provision of law, the agreement executed between the 5 county of Oneida and the Oneida Indian Nation executed on May twenty- 6 third, two thousand twenty-four, including, without limitation, the 7 provisions contained therein relating to confinement at the Oneida coun- 8 ty correctional facility of incarcerated adults remanded by the Oneida 9 Indian Nation court, shall, upon its effective date [and continuing for 10 three years thereafter], be deemed approved, ratified, validated and 11 confirmed by the legislature. It is the intention of the legislature in 12 enacting this section to ensure that the agreement be fully enforceable 13 in all respects as to the rights, benefits, responsibilities and privi- 14 leges of all parties under the agreement. 15 § 2. Section 854 of the county law, as added by chapter 213 of the 16 laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 17 § 854. Madison county-tribal detention agreement. Notwithstanding any 18 other inconsistent provision of law, the agreement executed between the 19 county of Madison and the Oneida Indian Nation executed on May twenty- 20 eighth, two thousand twenty-four, including, without limitation, the 21 provisions contained therein relating to confinement at the Madison 22 county correctional facility of incarcerated adults remanded by the 23 Oneida Indian Nation court, shall, upon its effective date [and continu- 24 ing for two years thereafter], be deemed approved, ratified, validated 25 and confirmed by the legislature. It is the intention of the legislature 26 in enacting this section to ensure that the agreement be fully enforcea- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15479-03-6 S. 9973 2 1 ble in all respects as to the rights, benefits, responsibilities and 2 privileges of all parties under the agreement. 3 § 3. Section 5 of chapter 213 of the laws of 2024 amending the 4 correction law relating to the use of certain county jails, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however that 7 section three of this act shall expire and be deemed repealed May 23, 8 [2027] 2033; provided further, however, that section four of this act 9 shall expire and be deemed repealed May 28, [2026] 2033; and provided 10 further, however, that the amendments to section 500-c of the correction 11 law made by section two of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 12 section and shall be deemed repealed therewith. 13 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 14 the amendments to sections 853 and 854 of the county law made by 15 sections one and two of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 16 sections and shall be deemed repealed therewith.